District of Columbia statutes.
31-711

Receivership.

Whenever it appears to the Mayor that any person has committed a violation of this subchapter which so impairs the financial condition of a domestic insurer as to threaten insolvency or make the further transaction of business by it hazardous to its policyholders, creditors, shareholders, or the public, the Commissioner may proceed as provided under the insurance laws of the District to take possession of the property of such a domestic insurer and to conduct its business, or take any other actions as the Mayor, at the Mayor’s discretion, deems appropriate.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-44, § 13, 40 DCR 6027
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(gg)(2), 44 DCR 1730
This section is referenced in § 31-704.
1981 Ed., § 35-3711.
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 11-159 as subchapter II of Chapter 37 of Title 35 [subchapter II of Chapter 7 of Title 31, 2001 Ed.], and the designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in this section.